Massachusetts, session 194th, H1888.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 24 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the
third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:
If the court is satisfied after the petitioner testifies under oath that there is reasonable
cause to believe that: (i) the child is suffering from serious abuse or neglect or is in immediate
danger of serious abuse or neglect; (ii) immediate removal of the child is necessary to protect the
child from serious abuse or neglect; and (iii) continuation of the child in their home is contrary to
their best interests, the court may issue an emergency order transferring custody of the child for
up to 72 hours to the department or to a licensed child care agency or individual described in
subclause (i) of clause (2) of subsection (b) of section 26.
The court also may make any other appropriate order, including conditions and
limitations, about the care and custody of the child as may be in the child's best interest,
of 2

including, but not limited to, those set forth in subclauses (1) to (3) of subsection (b) of section
26. In assessing whether continuation of a child in their home is contrary to their best interests
under this section and section 29C, the court shall consider the potential short and long term
harms of transferring custody to the department or to another person or entity, including trauma
caused by removal of the child from their home.
of 2